Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1622.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 6115.1. Civil liability of firearm owner for loss or theft.(a) Duty to report.--An owner or other person lawfully in possession of a firearm who suffers the loss or theft of a firearm shall, within 24 hours of the discovery of the loss or theft, report the loss or theft, including the facts and circumstances of the loss or theft, to the municipal police of the jurisdiction in which the loss or theft is believed to have occurred or to the Pennsylvania State Police.(b) Penalty.--A person who fails to report the loss or theft of a firearm under subsection (a) may be held civilly liable for 123456789101112131415161718 any damages resulting from that crime if the failure to report is a proximate cause of the commission of a crime in which the firearm is later used.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1622PN1956 - 2 - 1234